Utah statutes.
70A-9a-408.    Restrictions on assignment of promissory notes, health-care-
insurance receivables, and certain general intangibles ineffective.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a term in a promissory
note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor which relates
to a health-care-insurance receivable or a general intangible, including a
contract, permit, license, or franchise, and which term prohibits, restricts,
or requires the consent of the person obligated on the promissory note or the
account debtor to, the assignment or transfer of, or creation, attachment, or
perfection of a security interest in, the promissory note, health-care-
insurance receivable, or general intangible, is ineffective to the extent that
the term:
(a)  would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security
interest; or
(b)  provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, or
perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right
of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy
under the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general
intangible.
(2)  Subsection (1) applies to a security interest in a payment intangible or
promissory note only if the security interest arises out of a sale of the
payment intangible or promissory note.
(3)  A rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or
requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official, person
obligated on a promissory note, or account debtor to the assignment or
transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, a promissory note, health-
care-insurance receivable, or general intangible, including a contract,
permit, license, or franchise between an account debtor and a debtor, is
ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation:
(a)  would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security
interest; or
(b)  provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, or
perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right
of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy
under the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general
intangible.
(4)  To the extent that a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between
an account debtor and a debtor which relates to a health-care-insurance
receivable or general intangible or a rule of law, statute, or regulation
described in Subsection (3) would be effective under law other than this
chapter but is ineffective under Subsection (1) or (3), the creation,
attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the promissory note,
health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible:
(a)  is not enforceable against the person obligated on the promissory note or
the account debtor;
(b)  does not impose a duty or obligation on the person obligated on the
promissory note or the account debtor;
(c)  does not require the person obligated on the promissory note or the
account debtor to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance
to the secured party, or accept payment or performance from the secured party;
(d)  does not entitle the secured party to use or assign the debtor's rights
under the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general
intangible, including any related information or materials furnished to the
debtor in the transaction giving rise to the promissory note, health-care-
insurance receivable, or general intangible;
(e)  does not entitle the secured party to use, assign, possess, or have
access to any trade secrets or confidential information of the person
obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor; and
(f)  does not entitle the secured party to enforce the security interest in
the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible.
